Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1338
Values established; effect.

The county and all political subdivisions within the county shall be bound by the values established by the county assessor and equalized by the county board of equalization and the Tax Equalization and Review Commission for all property subject to its taxing power.

Laws 1969, c. 622, § 14, p. 2517;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 208;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 122;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 95;

Laws 1994, LB 902, § 17;

Laws 1997, LB 397, § 15;

Laws 2005, LB 261, § 4.